Maryland, session 2026, HB1189.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
6–103.3.
NOTWITHSTANDING § 2–114 OF THIS ARTICLE, BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026,
FROM THE TAX IMPOSED ON PROPERTY AND CASUALTY INSURERS UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE, $5,000,000 SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED ANNUALLY TO THE STATE DISASTER
RECOVERY FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 14–110.5 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY
ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1189*